Utah statutes.
36-11-304.   Expenditures over $10 prohibited -- Exceptions.

(1)  Except as provided in Subsection (2), a lobbyist, principal, or government officer may not make or offer to make aggregate daily expenditures that exceed $10.

(2)  A lobbyist, principal, or government officer may make aggregate daily expenditures that exceed $10:

(a)  for the following items, if the expenditure is reported in accordance with Section 36-11-201:

(i)  food;

(ii)  beverage;

(iii)  travel;

(iv)  lodging; or

(v)  admission to or attendance at a meeting or activity that is not an approved meeting or activity; or

(b)  if the expenditure is made for a purpose solely unrelated to the public official's position as a public official.

